Massachusetts, session 194th, H3422.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 7C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:
Section 73. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term “correctional facility” shall have
the same meaning as provided in section 1 of chapter 125.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a state agency or public
agency shall not:
of 3

(i) study, plan, design, acquire, lease, search for sites, or construct new correctional
facilities or detention centers;
(ii) expand the capacity of an existing correctional facility or detention center beyond its
current design or rated capacity;
(iii) convert any part of an existing or dormant correctional facility or detention center
for the purpose of detention or incarceration, including to change or expand the populations
incarcerated in that facility or center;
(iv) renovate an existing or dormant correctional facility or detention center beyond
performing routine maintenance and improvements limited only to ensuring compliance with
federal and state law including building, health, and fire codes; installing plumbing fixtures such
as toilets, showers, sinks, doors, or locks; improving food service or health services or medical
service
units; improving heating and cooling systems; removing restrictive housing units or
other security infrastructure; improving spaces for programming and education; provided that
such improvements shall not increase a facility’s bed capacity and must result in improved living
conditions for incarcerated people;
(v) repair an existing or dormant correctional facility or detention center for the purposes
of expanding the facility or center, or increasing its bed capacity.
SECTION 2. (a) For purposes of this section, the term “county jail and regional lockup
facility” shall mean a facility operated by a county sheriff that, as of the effective date of this act,
is used for all of the following: (i) the detention of convicted offenders; (ii) as a jail, as that term
of 3

is described in section 4 of chapter 126 of the General Laws; and (iii) as a regional lockup
facility utilized by more than 1 municipal law enforcement agency for the detention of arrestees.
(b) Notwithstanding clause (iii) of subsection (b) of section 73 of chapter 7C of the
General Laws, in the event that a county jail and regional lockup facility is closed due to the
closure of a county jail, the county sheriff may transfer no more than 30 beds from the closed
facility to an existing county correctional facility, as that term is defined in section 1 of chapter
125 of the General Laws, within the same county.
SECTION 3. Section 73 of chapter 7C of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of this act is hereby repealed.
SECTION 5. Sections 3 and 4 shall take effect 5 years after the effective date of this act.
of 3